Hawaii, session 2026, SB2850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 291-51, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended as follows: 1.  By amending the definition of "certificate of disability" to read: ""Certificate of disability" means a medical statement issued by a licensed practicing physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse that verifies that a person is [disabled,]: (1)  Disabled, limited, or impaired in the ability to walk[.]; or (2)  Blind or deaf." 2. By amending the definition of "person with a disability" to read: ""Person with a disability" means [a]: (1)  A person who is blind or deaf, as certified by a licensed practicing physician, physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse; or (2)  A person with a disability that limits or impairs the ability to walk, and who, as determined by a licensed practicing physician, physician assistant, or an advanced practice registered nurse: [(1)] (A)  Cannot walk two hundred feet without stopping to rest, and who has been diagnosed with: [(A)] (i)   An arthritic, neurological, orthopedic, renal, vascular, or oncological condition; [(B)] (ii) Lung disease to such an extent that the person's forced (respiratory) expiratory volume for one second, when measured by spirometry, is less than one liter, or the arterial oxygen tension is less than sixty mm/hg on room air at rest; or [(C)] (iii) A cardiac condition to the extent that the person's functional limitations are classified in severity as Class III or Class IV according to the standards set by the American Heart Association; and [(2)] (B)  Because of a condition identified in [paragraph (1):] subparagraph (A): [(A)] (i)   Cannot walk two hundred feet under the person's own power without stopping to rest; [(B)] (ii)  Cannot walk without the use of, or assistance from, a brace, cane, crutch, another person, prosthetic device, wheelchair, or other assistive device; or [(C)] (iii) Uses portable oxygen." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________